Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.160

Failing to summon assistance.

A person is guilty of the crime of failing to summon assistance if:

(1) He or she was present when a crime was committed against another person; and

(2) He or she knows that the other person has suffered substantial bodily harm as a result of the crime committed against the other person and that the other person is in need of assistance; and

(3) He or she could reasonably summon assistance for the person in need without danger to himself or herself and without interference with an important duty owed to a third party; and

(4) He or she fails to summon assistance for the person in need; and

(5) Another person is not summoning or has not summoned assistance for the person in need of such assistance.

[ 2005 c 209 s 1.]